District of Columbia statutes.
47-2714

District of Columbia Village rates.

(a)

The per diem rate to be charged for skilled care patients at District of Columbia Village shall be $82.50.

(b)

The per diem rate to be charged for intermediate care patients at District of Columbia Village shall be $56.00.

History

Sept. 14, 1976, D.C. Law 1-82, title IV, § 402, 23 DCR 2461
Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 2(b), 24 DCR 3343
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2714.
1973 Ed., § 47-2214.